Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3813
Certificate of authority; application; contents.

The incorporators shall file with the director an application for a certificate of authority to do business, which shall include or have attached the following:

(1) The names, addresses, and occupations of all incorporators, proposed directors, and officers;

(2) For corporate incorporators, their articles and bylaws and a list of the names, addresses, and occupations of their directors and principal officers and, for the three most recent years, their annual statements and reports;

(3) The proposed articles and bylaws;

(4) All agreements relating to the corporation to which any incorporator or proposed director or officer is a party;

(5) The amount and sources of the funds available for organization expenses and the proposed arrangements for reimbursement and compensation of incorporators or other persons;

(6) The proposed compensation of directors and officers;

(7) The forms to be used for any contracts between the corporation and its members or other persons concerning the provision of services;

(8) The proposed minimum amount of surplus;

(9) The plan for conducting its prepaid dental service plans including all of the following:

(a) The geographical area in which any plan is intended to operate;

(b) The types of dental services intended to be offered;

(c) The proposed marketing methods and copies of proposed marketing materials; and

(d) To the extent required by the director, the proposed method for the establishment of payment rates and other charges under the plans; and

(10) Such other documents or information as the director reasonably requires.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 13.